createYaml/yaml_output/VII_CNJ_magad.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:

  Lemma - ALL :

     atemagad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0SgProx/0PlProx: atemagak
     atemagad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0SgObv/0PlObv: atemagadinig
     atemagad+VII+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0SgProx/0PlProx: atemagasinog
     atemagad+VII+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0SgObv/0PlObv: atemagasininig
     atemagad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0SgProx/0PlProx: atemagakiban
     atemagad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0SgObv/0PlObv: atemagadinigiban
     atemagad+VII+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0SgProx/0PlProx: atemagasinoogiban
     atemagad+VII+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0SgObv/0PlObv: atemagasininigiban
     atemagad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0SgProx/0PlProx: atemagadogwen
     atemagad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0SgObv/0PlObv: atemagadinigwen
     atemagad+VII+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0SgProx/0PlProx: atemagasinoogwen
     atemagad+VII+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0SgObv/0PlObv: atemagasinoogwen
     atemagad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Dub+0SgProx/0PlProx: atemagadogobanen
     atemagad+VII+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Dub+0SgObv/0PlObv: atemagadinigobanen
     atemagad+VII+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Dub+0SgProx/0PlProx: atemagasinoogobanen
     atemagad+VII+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Dub+0SgObv/0PlObv: atemagasininigobanen
